District of Columbia statutes.
16-5001

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-257, § 2, 46 DCR 1309
June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-136, § 203, 47 DCR 2850
1981 Ed., § 16-5001.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of §§ 16-5001 through 16-5008 comprising Chapter 50 of Title 16 1981 Ed., see § 202(b) of the Adoption and Safe Families Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-56, March 7, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 1978)).
For temporary (225 day) addition of §§ 16-5001 through 16-5008 comprising Chapter 50 of Title 16 [1981 Edition], see §§ 2 to 9 of the Criminal Background Investigation for the Protection of Children Temporary Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-205, March 26, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 3431).
For temporary addition of chapter, see § 2-9 of the Criminal Background Investigation for the Protection of Children Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-6, February 8, 1999, 46 DCR 2296).
For temporary repeal of this chapter, see § 202(b) of the Adoption and Safe Families Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-117, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6558).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of this chapter, see § 3(b) of the Adoption and Safe Families Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-383, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6700).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of this chapter, see § 3(b) of the Adoption and Safe Families Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-451, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9399).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of this chapter, see § 3(b) of Adoption and Safe Families Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-65, June 6, 2001, 48 DCR 5721).